Maine, session 132, LD645.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §8703, sub-§2, as amended by PL 2009, c. 71, §6, is further
amended to read:
2. Board of directors. The organization operates under the supervision of a board of
directors, which consists of 20 12 voting members and one nonvoting member.
A. The Governor shall appoint 18 11 board members in accordance with the following
requirements. Appointments by the Governor are not subject to review or
confirmation.
(1) Four Two members must represent consumers chosen from a list provided by
a statewide organization representing consumers. For the purposes of this section,
"consumer" means a person who is not affiliated with or employed by a 3rd-party
payor, a provider or an association representing those providers or those 3rd-party
payors.
(2) Three Two members must represent employers. One member must be chosen
from a list provided by a health management statewide purchasing coalition in this
State. One member must be chosen from a list provided by a statewide chamber
of commerce.
(3) Two members must represent 3rd-party payors chosen from a list provided by
a statewide organization representing 3rd-party payors.
(4) Nine Four members must represent health care providers. Two One health
care provider members member must represent hospitals and health systems that
include hospitals chosen from a list provided by the Maine Hospital Association a
statewide association representing hospitals and health systems that include
hospitals. Two health care provider members must be physicians or
representatives of physicians, one may not be affiliated with a hospital or a health
system that includes a hospital and must be chosen from a list provided by the
Maine Medical Association and one chosen from a list provided by the Maine
Page 1 - 132LR0530(03)

Osteopathic Association a statewide association that represents health care
providers. One health care provider member must be a pharmacist chosen from a
list provided by a statewide association of pharmacists. One provider member
must be a doctor of chiropractic chosen from a list provided by a statewide
chiropractic association. One provider member must be a representative, chosen
from a list provided by the Maine Primary Care Association, of a federally
qualified health center. One provider member must be a pharmacist chosen from
a list provided by the Maine Pharmacy Association. One provider member must
be a mental health provider chosen from a list provided by the Maine Association
of Mental Health Services. One provider member must represent a home health
care company.
(5) One member must represent the pharmaceutical industry, including
pharmaceutical manufacturers, wholesale distributors and pharmacy benefits
managers, chosen from a list provided by a statewide association representing life
sciences companies.
B. The commissioner shall appoint one member who is an employee of the department
to represent the State's interest in maintaining health data and to ensure that information
collected is available for determining public health policy Director of the Office of
MaineCare Services or the director’s designee shall serve as a member of the board.
D. The Executive Director of Dirigo Health, or a designee of the executive director
who is an employee of Dirigo Health, shall serve as a voting member.
E. The Commissioner of Professional and Financial Regulation, or the commissioner's
designee who is an employee of the Department of Professional and Financial
Regulation, shall serve in a nonvoting, consultative capacity.
F. The executive director of the organization shall serve as a nonvoting member of the
board.
Sec. 2. 22 MRSA §8703, sub-§3, ¶A, as amended by PL 2005, c. 253, §4, is further
amended to read:
A. The terms of board members appointed by the Governor are determined as follows.
(1) Initial terms are staggered. One consumer, one employer, one 3rd-party payor
and 3 providers shall serve one-year terms. Two consumers, one employer, one
3rd-party payor and 3 providers shall serve 2-year terms.
(2) After the initial terms, members Members appointed by the Governor shall
serve full 3-year terms and shall continue to serve until their successors have been
appointed.
(3) Board members may serve 3 full terms consecutively.
Page 2 - 132LR0530(03)